Idaho, session 2025, S1003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-1402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-1402. PENALTY -- INFRACTION -- MISDEMEANOR -- FELONY -- REVOCATION
OF LICENSE -- DISPOSITION OF MONEYS. (a) Infraction Penalty. Except as pro-
vided for in subsection (b) of this section, any person who pleads guilty to
or is found guilty of an infraction of this code, or rules or proclamations
promulgated pursuant thereto, shall be subject to a fine of seventy-two dol-
lars ($72.00).
(b) A violation of section 36-1401(a)1.(K) through (L) or (a)2.(U)
through (Y), Idaho Code, shall constitute an infraction subject to a fine of
two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(c) Misdemeanor Penalty. Any person entering a plea of guilty for,
found guilty of or convicted of a misdemeanor under the provisions of this
title or rules or proclamations promulgated pursuant thereto shall, ex-
cept in cases where a higher penalty is prescribed, be fined in a sum of not
less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) and/or by commitment to jail for not more than six (6) months. The
minimum fine, per animal, fish or bird, for the illegal taking, illegal pos-
session or the illegal waste of the following animals, fish or birds shall be
as indicated below:
Animal, Fish or Bird Minimum Fine
Bighorn sheep, mountain goat and moose $500
Elk $300
Any other big game animal $200
Wild turkey, swan and sturgeon $200
Chinook salmon, wild steelhead and bull trout $100
Any other game bird, game fish or furbearer $ 25
(d) Felony Penalty. Any person entering a plea of guilty for, found
guilty of or convicted of a felony under the provisions of this title shall be
punished in accordance with section 18-112, Idaho Code. Provided further,
that the judge hearing the case shall forthwith revoke for life, the hunting,
fishing or trapping license and privileges of any person who, within a five


(5) year period, pleads guilty to, is found guilty of or is convicted of three
(3) or more felony violations of the provisions of this title.
(e) License Revocation. Any person entering a plea of guilty or being
found guilty or convicted of violating any of the provisions of this title,
or who otherwise fails to comply with the requirements of a citation in con-
nection with any such offense, may, in addition to any other penalty assessed
by the court, have his hunting, fishing, or trapping privileges revoked for
such period of time as may be determined by the court not to exceed three (3)
years, except that violations classified as felonies under section 36-1401,
Idaho Code, or as flagrant violations as defined in subsection (f) of this
section, shall authorize the court to impose license revocations for peri-
ods of time up to and including life, with said period beginning on the date
of conviction, finding of guilt or the entry of the plea of guilty. Pro-
vided further, that the magistrate hearing the case shall forthwith revoke
the hunting, fishing, or trapping privileges for a period of not less than
one (1) year for any of the following offenses:
1. Taking or possessing upland game birds, migratory waterfowl,
salmon, steelhead, sturgeon, or any big game animal during closed sea-
son.
2. Exceeding the daily bag or possession limit of upland game birds, mi-
gratory waterfowl or big game animals.
3. Taking any fish by unlawful methods as set forth in section 36-902(a)
or (c), Idaho Code.
4. Unlawfully purchasing, possessing or using any license, tag or per-
mit as set forth in section 36-405(c), Idaho Code.
5. Violating section 36-1603, Idaho Code.
6. The unlawful release of any species of live fish into any public body
of water in the state. For purposes of this paragraph, an "unlawful re-
lease of any species of live fish" shall mean a release of any species of
live fish, or live eggs thereof, in the state without the permission of
the director of the department of fish and game; provided, that no per-
mission is required when fish are being freed from a hook and released at
the same time and place where caught or when crayfish are being released
from a trap at the same time and place where caught.
Provided further, that the magistrate hearing the case of a first-time
hunting violation offender under the age of twenty-one (21) years may re-
quire that the offender attend a remedial hunter education course at the of-
fender's expense. Upon successful completion of the course, the remainder
of the revocation period shall be subject to a withheld judgment as long as
the offender is not convicted of any additional hunting violations during
the period. The cost of the course shall be seventy-five dollars ($75.00) to
be paid to the department. The commission shall establish by rule the cur-
riculum of the hunter education remedial course.
The revocation shall consist of cancellation of an existing license for
the required length of time and/or denial of the privilege of purchasing an
applicable license for the length of time required to meet the revocation
period decreed. In the case of persons pleading guilty, convicted or found
guilty of committing multiple offenses, the revocation periods may run
consecutively. In the case of pleas of guilty, convictions or findings of
guilt involving taking big game animals during closed season or exceeding


the daily bag or possession limit of big game, the magistrate hearing the
case shall revoke the hunting, fishing or trapping privileges of any person
convicted or found guilty of those offenses for a period of not less than one
(1) year for each big game animal illegally taken or possessed by the person
convicted or found guilty.
It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to hunt, fish, or trap or pur-
chase a license to do so during the period of time for which such privilege is
revoked.
For the purpose of this title, the term "conviction" shall mean either a
withheld judgment or a final conviction.
(f) Flagrant Violations. In addition to any other penalties assessed
by the court, the magistrate hearing the case shall forthwith revoke the
hunting, fishing or trapping privileges for a period of not less than one
(1) year and may revoke the privileges for a period up to and including the
person's lifetime, for any person who enters a plea of guilty, who is found
guilty, or who is convicted of any of the following flagrant violations:
1. Taking a big game animal after sunset by spotlighting, with use of
artificial light, or with a night vision enhancement device.
2. Unlawfully taking two (2) or more big game animals within a twelve
(12) month period.
3. Taking a big game animal with a rimfire or centerfire cartridge
firearm during an archery or muzzleloader only hunt.
4. Hunting, fishing, trapping or purchasing a license when license
privileges have been revoked pursuant to this section or section
36-1501, Idaho Code.
5. Taking any big game animal during a closed season.
6. Any felony violation provided in section 36-1401, Idaho Code.
(g) For purposes of the wildlife violator compact, section 36-2301,
Idaho Code, et seq., the department shall:
1. Suspend a violator's license for failure to comply with the terms of
a citation from a party state. A copy of a report of failure to comply
from the licensing authority of the issuing state shall be conclusive
evidence.
2. Revoke a violator's license for a conviction in a party state. A
report of conviction from the licensing authority of the issuing state
shall be conclusive evidence.
(h) Disposition of Fines and Forfeitures. Distribution of fines and
forfeitures remitted shall be in accordance with section 19-4705, Idaho
Code.
(i) Any person with outstanding fines or judgments of reimbursement or
restitution from violations of this title shall not be eligible to apply for
any fishing, hunting, or trapping license, tag, or permit. Lifetime license
certificate holders shall not be eligible to apply for a license until all
fines, reimbursements, and restitution are paid in full. The provisions of
this subsection shall not apply to violators on approved time payment plans
that are not ninety (90) days or more in arrears.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.